Missouri, session 2026, SB1418.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 476, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 476.1020, to read as
follows:
476.1020. Any official court record pertaining to a
case in which a person is charged with any offense
reportable under section 43.506 or any ordinance violation
shall not be made available to a member of the public
through any statewide court automation system. However,
such official court record may be:
(1) Made available to a member of the public through
any statewide court automation system if such member is
physically present at a courthouse and the official court
record is a record for that particular court; or
(2) Included in any statewide court automation system
accessible to the following persons:
(a) Court personnel;
(b) Law enforcement agencies;
(c) Judges;
(d) Prosecutors;
(e) A defendant's attorney; or

SB 1418 2
(f) Any other person needing access to such record if
deemed necessary by the court.
✓